src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
LEXICON N_PIZE2
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KUDO_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_KUDO
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_KUDO-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _KUDO-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_AVIDEM
!! Does this need a diminutive?
@P.POS.N@+AssocColl:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;


!! NMN
LEXICON NMN_KAL
 N_KUDO-Derivation ;
 N_KAL-Def-Declension ;
 _KAL-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON NMN_KEL1 !!= * @CODE@ кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
! harmony: front
 N_KEL1-Derivation ;  !2015-04-18
 N_KAL-Def-Declension ;
 _KAL-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON NMN_PEJ !!= * @CODE@ кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
 NMN_KEL1 ;

LEXICON NMN_TEV
 NMN_KAL ;
LEXICON NMN_LAV
 NMN_KAL ;
LEXICON NMN_LAK
 N_LAK-Derivation ;
 N_LAK-Def-Declension ;
 _LAK-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON NMN_KIT
 N_KUDO-Derivation ;
!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl:%>TLoss NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
 N_KIT-Def-Declension ;
 _KIT-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON NMN_KLASS
 N_KLASS-Derivation ;
 N_OSH-Def-Declension ;
 _OSH-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

!LEXICON NMN_KARDAZ
! NMN_OSH ;
LEXICON NMN_LEVKS
 NMN_OSH ;
LEXICON NMN_ROZ1
 NMN_OSH ;
LEXICON NMN_OZKS
 NMN_OSH ;
LEXICON NMN_KENKSH
 NMN_OSH ;
LEXICON NMN_OSH
 N_OSH-Derivation ;
 N_OSH-Def-Declension ;
 _OSH-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

!LEXICON NMN_OSH-PL !!= * __@CODE@__ This needs checking 2013-03-27
! N_OSH-Derivation ;
! NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
! _OSH-Indef-Declension-PL ;
! N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_TESHTE
 NMN_PANGO ;

!LEXICON NMN_CHUVTO
! NMN_PANGO ;

LEXICON NMN_LAVSHO
 NMN_PANGO ;

LEXICON NMN_EKSHE
 NMN_PANGO ;

!LEXICON NMN_TINGE
! NMN_PANGO ;

LEXICON NMN_PANGO
 N_PANGO-Derivation ;
 N_PANGO-Def-Declension ;
 _PANGO-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON NMN_KI
 NMN_KUDO ;
:я PRL-INDEF ;
:я SG-PRL-DEF ;
+Sg+Prl:ява PossPX1 ;

LEXICON NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS
 N_KUDO-Derivation ;
 SG-ELA-DEF ;
 SG-INE-DEF ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-ELA-DEF_Dial-NW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-INE-DEF_Dial-NW ;
NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
 PL-NOM-INDEF ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: ABL-INDEF ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%> ABL-PX ;
 ELA-INDEF ;
 ILL-INDEF ;
 INE-INDEF ;
 ELA-PX ;
 INE-PX ;

LEXICON NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS
 N_KUDO-Derivation ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-ELA-DEF_Dial-NW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-INE-DEF_Dial-NW ;
NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
 PL-NOM-INDEF ;
 ABL-PX ;
 ELA-PX ;
 INE-PX ;
 SG-ELA-DEF ;
 SG-INE-DEF ;
 
 ABL-INDEF ;
 ELA-INDEF ;
 ILL-INDEF ;
 INE-INDEF ;

LEXICON NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS
!!
 SG-NOM-DEF ;
 SG-GEN-DEF ;
 SG-DAT-DEF ;
 SG-CMP-DEF ;
 SG-ABL-DEF ;
 SG-PRL-DEF ;
 SG-ABE-DEF ;
 SG-TRA-DEF ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/M: SG-DAT-DEF_Dial-M ; ! Shoksha & Drakino
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/M: SG-GEN-DEF_Dial-M ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/M: SG-ILL-DEF_Dial-M ; ! 
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/M: SG-NOM-DEF_Dial-M ; ! 

+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-GEN-DEF_Dial-NW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-DAT-DEF_Dial-NW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-ABL-DEF_Dial-NW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-CMP-DEF_Dial-NW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-PRL-DEF_Dial-NW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-ABE-DEF_Dial-NW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW: SG-TRA-DEF_Dial-NW ;
 SG-NOM-INDEF ;
 
 ABE-INDEF ;
 ABL-INDEF ;
 CMP-INDEF ;
 COM-INDEF ;
 DAT-INDEF ;
 GEN-INDEF ;
 PRL-INDEF ;
 TMP-INDEF ; !!= * __@CODE@__ Check this
 TRA-INDEF ;
 ABE-PX ;
 ABL-PX ;
 CMP-PX ;
 DAT-PX ;
 ILL-PX ;
 INE-PX ;
 PRL-PX ;
 TRA-PX ;
 SG-NOM-PX ;
 PL-NOM-PX ;
 SG-GEN-PX ;
 PL-GEN-PX ;

LEXICON NMN_KUDO
 N_KUDO-Derivation ;
 NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
 _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
 N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON NMN_KUDO-PL !!= * __@CODE@__ This needs checking 2013-03-27
 N_KUDO-Derivation ;
 NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
 _KUDO-Indef-Declension-PL ;
 N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON NMN_VELE
!! harmony: front
! N_KUDO-Derivation ;
! NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
! _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
! N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;


! ========== !
!! DERIVATION 
! ========== !

LEXICON N_LAK-Derivation
 N_KAL-Derivation ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl+Tra+Indef:%>KLossкс N2Dem-SE ;!CHECKME 2019-01-25
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl+Tra+Indef:%>KLossкс%>%{оеэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;


LEXICON N_KIT-Derivation
 N_KAL-Derivation;


LEXICON N_KAL-Derivation
+SP+Ela+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Ine+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+SP+Prl+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}шка _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SP+Abe+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;

+Use/NG+SP+Tra+Indef+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>%{оеэØ%}кс _OSH-N2-Def-Declension ;

!#this far 2019-01-30

+Pl+Gen: POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE ;
+SP+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE ;
+SP+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE ;
+SP+Prl:%>Г2а POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE ;
+SP+Cmpr:%>%{оеэØ%}шка POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE ;
+SP+Abe:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1 POSSX-OBL4-N2DEM-SE ;

 N_KAL-Derivation-WITH-POSSX ;

+Pl+Ela+Def+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>тнЕ3%>стэ _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Ine+Def+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>тнЕ3%>сэ _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/NG+Pl+Prl+Def+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>тнЕ3%>Г2а _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>тнЕ3%>шка _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Abe+Def+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>тнЕ3%>втеме _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Tra+Def+Der+Der/MWN+N:%>тнЕ3%>кс _OSH-N2-Def-Declension ;

+SP+Gen+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}нь%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+SP+Ela+Indef:%>ст%{оэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+SP+Ine+Indef:%>с%{оэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;
+SP+Prl+Indef:%>Г2а N2Dem-SE ;
+SP+Cmpr+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}шка N2Dem-SE ;
+SP+Abe+Indef:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1 N2Dem-SE ;
+SP+Tra+Indef:%>кс N2Dem-SE ;!CHECKME 2019-01-26
+SP+Tra+Indef:%>кс%>%{оеэØ%} N2Dem-SE ;


+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Sg+Abe+Def:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1%>нть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Use/-Spell+Sg+Gen+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Use/-Spell+Sg+Ela+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Use/-Spell+Sg+Ine+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>с%{оэØ%}%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Use/-Spell+Sg+Prl+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>Г2а%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Use/-Spell+Sg+Cmpr+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>%{оеэØ%}шка%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Use/-Spell+Sg+Abe+Def+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1%>%>сть%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нь%> N2Dem-SE ; !!= * __@CODE@__ _ь_ retension through double %>%>
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнЕ3%>стэ N2Dem-SE ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнЕ3%>сэ N2Dem-SE ;
+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>Г2а N2Dem-SE ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тнЕ3%>шка N2Dem-SE ;
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тнЕ3%>втеме N2Dem-SE ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>кс N2Dem-SE ;!CHECKME 2019-01-26
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>ксэ N2Dem-SE ;
