src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
алнэ:алнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ангелнэ:ангелнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ария:ария N_KUDO  "aaria" ;
арнэ:арнэ N_PIZE2  "voima" ;
ацамот:ацамо N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
базарнэ:базарнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
бараннэ:бараннэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
бизьгатат:бизьгата N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
благовещения:благовещения N_KUDO  "" ;
ботолнэ:ботолнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
брюкат:брюка N_KUDO-PL  "(mon.) housut" ;
вазнэ:вазнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
валпизэ:валпизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
вальмапелцят:вальма#пелця N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
варьгинеть:варьгине N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
вахта:вахта N_KUDO  "(meri)vahti" ;
велямот:велямо N_KUDO-PL  "viipsinpuut" ;
верьгедемкат:верьгедемка N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
верьгизнэ:верьгизнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
воспаления:воспаления N_KUDO  "tulehdus" ;
граблят:грабля N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
губорьпря:губорь#пря N_KUDO  "" ;
дия:дия N_KUDO  "" ;
дёго:дёго N_KUDO  "" ;
жарнэ:жарнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
зыяннэ:зыяннэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
изамот:изамо N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
иммунотерапия:иммунотерапия N_KUDO  "" ;
кавычкат:кавычка N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
каляват:калява N_KUDO-PL  "(mon.) lasten jalkovälistä avonaiset housut" ;
кардазкиска:кардаз#киска N_KUDO  "" ;
кашапизэ:кашапизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
кевкат:кевка N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
кедьлезэ:кедьлезэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
кекшненесэ:кекшненесэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
кечеколганнэ:кечеколганнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
кечэ:кечэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
килейпуло:килей#пуло N_KUDO  "" ;
контрнаступления:контрнаступления N_KUDO  "vastahyökkäys" ;
кортамкат:кортамка N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
коткудавпизэ:коткудав#пизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
котёлнэ:котёлнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
кувшиннэ:кувшиннэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
кудрят:кудря N_KUDO-PL  "kiharat" ;
куймака:куймака N_KUDO  "" ;
курянчкесэ:курянчкесэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
куслят:кусля N_KUDO-PL  "(mon.) kiisseli" ;
куярнэ:куярнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
лезэ:лезэ N_PIZE2  "hyöty" ;
лейожа:лейожа N_KUDO  "" ;
лекшат:лекша N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
лискат:лиска N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
маласа:маласа N_KUDO  "" ;
манёврат:манёвра N_KUDO-PL  "sotaharjoitukset" ;
масторлезэ:масторлезэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
мекшпизэ:мекшпизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
мечэ:мечэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
модамалина:модамалина N_KUDO  "" ;
мурзанизэ:мурзанизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
мушковидьметь:мушко#видьме N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
невтелма:невтелма N_KUDO  "" ;
нешкепизэ:нешкепизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
обезьганнэ:обезьганнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ождят:ождя N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
ойджакшкесэ:ойджакшкесэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
округа:округа N_KUDO  "" ;
пазнэ:пазнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
панжомат:панжома N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
пантомима:пантомима N_KUDO  "" ;
пекшеёзнэ:пекшеёзнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "kanervakäärme" ;
пелекизэ:пелекизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
пешксесэ:пешксесэ N_PIZE2  "raskaana oleva (nainen)" ;
пиксиця:пиксиця N_KUDO  "" ;
письмарнэ:письмарнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
пичеть:пиче N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
полянка:полянка N_KUDO  "" ;
потмоцепкеть:потмо#цепке N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
пространства:пространства N_KUDO  "" ;
ревизионизма:ревизионизма N_KUDO  "revisionismi" ;
ривезьтуворнэ:ривезьтуворнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ризэ:ризэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
салнэ:салнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
сасынесэ:сасынесэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
светотехника:светотехника N_KUDO  "" ;
сезьганпизэ:сезьганпизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
сельвачат:сельвача N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
соболезнования:соболезнования N_KUDO  "" ;
столэкшэ:столэкшэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
стулнэ:стулнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
судо:судо N_KUDO  "nenä" ;
суманнеть:суманнеть N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
таваднэ:таваднэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ташламо:ташламо N_KUDO  "" ;
тетидем:тетиде N_AVIDEM  "" ;
тетидень:тетидень N_AVIDEM  "" ;
тонолнэ:тонолнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
тортат:торта N_KUDO-PL  "(mon.) pohjasakka" ;
тунеядства:тунеядства N_KUDO  "" ;
уголнэ:уголнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
удгатикшэ:удгатикшэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
уряжнэ:уряжнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ципушкат:ципушка N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
цянавпизэ:цянавпизэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
цётмарнэ:цётмарнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
чадышка:чадышка N_KUDO  "" ;
чипазнэ:чи#пазнэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
чокшне:чокшнэ N_PIZE2  "ilta" ;
штанат:штана N_KUDO-PL  "" ;
эзнэ:эзнэ N_PIZE2  "" ;
юга:юга N_KUDO  "" ;
ямнэ:ямне N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ёзнэ:ёзнэ N_PIZE2  "käärme" ;
ённэ:ённэ N_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
